Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Investment and Debt Management

42.400.
Office of Financial Management.

The Office of Financial Management established in KRS 42.4201 shall be headed by an executive director responsible to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, and appointed by the secretary upon approval of the Governor in accordance with the provisions of KRS

12.050

.

There are included in the Office of Financial Management established in KRS 42.4201 the positions of deputy executive directors for investment and debt management, who shall be employed in the classified service as set forth inKRS Chapter 18A.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 310, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1990, ch. 321, § 3, effective July 13, 1990; 2000, ch. 46, § 6, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 85, §
15, effective June 20, 2005.

42.409.
Definitions for KRS 42.410 and 45.760.

As used in KRS

42.410

and

45.760

, unless the context requires otherwise:

“State total personal income” means the measure of all income received by or on behalf of persons in the Commonwealth, as most recently published in the Survey of Current Business by the United States Department of Commerce, Bureau of Economic Analysis.

“Estimated state total personal income” means the personal income figure used by the Governor’s Office for Economic Analysis to generate final detailed revenue estimates.

“Total revenues” means revenues credited to the general fund and the road fund consistent with the provisions of KRS

48.120

, as well as any restricted agency fund account from which debt service is expended.

“Anticipated total revenues” means the official revenue estimates, as provided for in KRS

48.120

, projected for the general fund and the road fund, as well as any restricted agency fund account from which debt service is expended.

“Available revenues” means revenues credited to the general fund and the road fund consistent with the provisions of KRS

48.120

, as well as any restricted agency fund account from which debt service is expended, minus any statutorily dedicated receipts of the respective funds.

“Anticipated available revenues” means official revenue estimates, as provided for in KRS

48.120

, projected for the general fund and the road fund, as well as any restricted agency fund account from which debt service is expended, minus any statutorily dedicated receipts of the respective funds.

“Total assessed value of property” means state total net assessed value of property for taxes due, as obtained from the Department of Revenue.

“Per capita” means per unit of population, where population figures are the most recent available from the University of Louisville, Kentucky State Data Center.

“Appropriation-supported debt service” means the amount of an appropriation identified to be expended for debt service purposes in the executive budget recommendation, and the amount of an appropriation expended for debt services in a completed fiscal year.

“Appropriation-supported debt” means the outstanding principal of bonds issued by all state agencies and all individuals, agencies, authorities, boards, cabinets, commissions, corporations, or other entities of, or representing the Commonwealth with the authority to issue bonds, and for which debt service is appropriated by the General Assembly.

“Nonappropriation-supported debt” means the outstanding principal of bonds issued by all state agencies and all individuals, agencies, authorities, boards, cabinets, commissions, corporations, or other entities of, or representing the Commonwealth with the authority to issue bonds, and for which debt service is not appropriated by the General Assembly.

“Statutorily dedicated receipts” means revenues credited to the general fund and road fund consistent with the provisions of KRS

48.120

, as well as any restricted agency fund account, which are required by an enacted statute to be used for a specific purpose. Statutorily dedicated receipts include, but are not limited to, the following:

Receipts credited to the general fund which are subject to KRS

42.450

to

42.495

, KRS

278.130

to

278.150

, or KRS

350.139

;

Receipts credited to the road fund which are subject to KRS

175.505

, KRS

177.320

, KRS

177.365

to

177.369

, KRS

177.9771

to

177.979

, KRS

186.531

, or KRS

186.535

; and

Receipts credited to a restricted agency fund account in accordance with any applicable statute.

“True interest cost” means the bond yield according to issue price without a reduction for related administrative costs, and is the same figure as the arbitrage yield calculation described in the United States Tax Reform Act of 1986.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 30, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 2000, ch. 46, § 7, effective July 14, 2000; 2004, ch. 78, § 3, effective April 6, 2004; 2005, ch. 85, § 52, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 78, § 27, effective June 25, 2009.

42.410.
Duties of Office of Financial Management — Contents of state debt report.

The Office of Financial Management established in KRS 42.4201 shall, subject to the provisions of KRS

41.020

to

41.375

and KRS

42.500

, have and perform functions and duties as follows:

The analysis and management of short and long-term cash flow requirements;

The maximization of the return on state investments given the cash flow and liquidity requirements;

The coordination and monitoring of cash needs relative to investment and debt activity;

The development of a long-term debt plan including criteria for the issuance of debt and an evaluation of how much total state debt is justified;

The responsibility for liaison with the General Assembly on all investment and debt matters, including, but not limited to, new bond issues, the status of state debt, and the status of state investments; and

All other functions of the cabinet relative to state investment and debt management including, but not limited to, the making of debt service payments, the sale of bonds, and staff assistance to the State Property and Buildings Commission, the Asset Liability Commission, and the State Investment Commission.

The Office of Financial Management shall render monthly written reports concerning the performance of each investment to the State Investment Commission.

The Office of Financial Management shall review state appropriation-supported bond issues for possible debt service savings through refundings as market conditions warrant.

The Office of Financial Management shall submit a report within forty-five (45) days after the publication of the Comprehensive Annual Financial Report to the Legislative Research Commission, for referral to the appropriate committee, indicating the bond issues refunded, original and new interest rates, estimated savings, original and new amortization schedules, issuance costs, debt reserves, disposition of savings, and information on economic, fiscal, and market indicators of the Commonwealth’s debt position.

The state debt report shall include, but not be limited to, economic, fiscal, and market indicators of debt position as set forth in this section. Indicators shall be presented in tabular and, where appropriate, graphical form. Indicators shall be presented for the fiscal year just ended and, if data is available and except as otherwise noted, for the preceding nine (9) fiscal years.

Economic indicators shall include:

Nonappropriation-supported debt as a percent of state total personal income;

Nonappropriation-supported debt as a percent of total assessed value of property;

Nonappropriation-supported debt per capita;

Appropriation-supported debt as a percent of state total personal income;

Appropriation-supported debt as a percent of total assessed value of property;

Appropriation-supported debt per capita;

Appropriation-supported debt service as a percent of total state personal income;

Appropriation-supported debt service as a percent of total assessed value of property; and

Appropriation-supported debt service per capita.

Fiscal indicators shall be reported separately and in total for the general fund, the road fund, and each restricted fund account from which debt service is expended.

Fiscal indicators shall include:

Annual appropriation-supported debt service as a percent of total revenues; and

Annual appropriation-supported debt service as a percent of available revenues.

Market indicators shall include:

The rating assigned by Moody’s Investors Services, Inc., or a comparable rating agency, to each nonappropriation-supported bond issued in the fiscal year just ended;

The rating assigned by Moody’s Investors Services, Inc., or a comparable rating agency, to each appropriation-supported bond issued in the fiscal year just ended;

A comparison of the difference between the true interest cost of each nonappropriation-supported bond issued and the value of a selected revenue bond index, as published by the Bond Buyer Weekly, the Delphis Hanover Corporation, or other comparable service on a date relevant to the bond issue; and

A comparison of the difference between the true interest cost of each appropriation-supported bond issued and the value of a selected municipal bond index, as published by the Bond Buyer Weekly, the Delphis Hanover Corporation, or other comparable service on a date relevant to the bond issue.

The state debt report shall contain a complete description of the sources of data used to prepare the report. This description shall include, but not be limited to, an enumeration, by fund and restricted fund account, of all debt, debt service, and revenue figures; the source and publication date of figures used for state total personal income, total assessed value of property, population, and selected bond indexes.

If the sources of data used in a current report differ substantially from those used in the report of the preceding year, the report shall include a detailed explanation of the change. If possible, data presented in the current report for previous years shall be calculated so that, in any one (1) report, indicators for all years are calculated using consistent data categories. The use of any inconsistent data shall be noted and explained.

Nothing in this section shall authorize any act inconsistent with the authority granted the State Investment Commission by KRS

42.500

and

42.525

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 310, § 2, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 382, § 23, effective July 15, 1982; 1988, ch. 82, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 30, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 321, § 4, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 295, § 3, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 508, § 13, effective July 15, 1994; 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 42, effective May 30, 1997; 2000, ch. 46, § 8, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 85, § 16, effective June 20, 2005.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The Kentucky Housing Corporation must submit all proposed bond issues and debt financing to the office for investment and debt management since this section and KRS

42.420

when read together, in pari materia, show that the legislative intent was to establish a centralized entity in the Finance Department (now Finance and Administration Cabinet) to evaluate, review and approve all proposed anticipation notes and bond issues of all state agencies and all agencies, commissions, corporations or other entities of or representing the Commonwealth.

OAG 81-242

.

For review and approval procedures of office for Investment and Debt Management found to conform with KRS

42.420

and this section, see

OAG 82-444

.

The review and approval function in the case, which involved issuance of industrial revenue bonds by Kentucky Development Finance Authority for benefit of corporation which desired to finance certain new equipment, should be restricted to these factors: (1) a determination that the proposed bonds were in reasonable conformity with the general legislative policy expressed in KRS Chapters 103 and 154; and (2) the evaluation of revenue projections relative to the proposed bond issue including a reasonable determination of the fiscal or financial soundness of the company; in a revenue bond issue of this category, the Division (now Office) of Investment and Debt Management has no authority to require by regulations a rating agency presentation, competitive bidding of all advisers, consultants, trustees, underwriters and bond counsel and a determination that the proposed bond issue has been legally authorized by and/or determined feasible in a biennial budget.

OAG 83-453

.

The Office of Financial Management and Economic Analysis’ (OFMEA) lending of the Workers’ Compensation Funding Commission’s securities constitutes a violation of KRS

342.1227

based on the statutory authority for OFMEA to invest funds in repurchase agreements combined with the separate accounting and full collateralization of the Commission funds.

OAG 93-13

.

The Office of Financial Management and Economic Analysis’ overnight investment of the Workers’ Compensation Funding Commission’s funds is impermissible under KRS 342.1223(2)(a).

OAG 93-13

.

42.420.
Proposed bond issuance subject to approval prior to issuance.

All other provisions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes notwithstanding, all state agencies and all individuals, agencies, authorities, boards, cabinets, commissions, corporations, or other entities of, or representing the Commonwealth with the authority to issue bonds, shall submit all proposed bond issues, bond anticipation notes, or interim debt financing to the Office of Financial Management for review and approval prior to issuance of such debt.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 310, § 3, effective July 15, 1980; 1990, ch. 321, § 5, effective July 13, 1990; 2000, ch. 46, § 9, effective July 14, 2000.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Cities and counties would not come under this section since a similar approval procedure is provided in KRS

66.045

and

66.310

, involving the state local finance officer and this section was not intended to be duplicative.

OAG 81-242

.

The Kentucky Housing Corporation must submit all proposed bond issues and debt financing to the Office for Investment and Debt Management since KRS

42.410

and this section when read together, in pari materia, show that the legislative intent was to establish a centralized entity in the Finance Department (now Finance and Administration Cabinet) to evaluate, review and approve all proposed anticipation notes and bond issues of all state agencies and all agencies, commissions, corporations or other entities of or representing the Commonwealth.

OAG 81-242

.

When this section is read together with KRS

42.410

, which stresses state debt and investments, it is clear that this section requires that all of the proposed debt issues of all central state agencies and of all individuals, commissions or corporations of or acting for the state, be reviewed and approved by the Office for Investment and Debt Management prior to issuance; thus, this section applies to all state agencies issuing revenue bonds and anticipation notes, to all debt issuing entities which issue debt in the name of the state, and to all corporations created by the state which issue revenue bonds and anticipation notes.

OAG 81-242

.

For review and approval procedures of Office for Investment and Debt Management found to conform with KRS

42.410

and this section, see

OAG 82-444

.

Industrial revenue bonds issued by the Kentucky Development Finance Authority require the approval of the Office for Investment and Debt Management pursuant to this section.

OAG 83-131

.

Under the language of KRS

154.20-020

, the Kentucky Development Finance Authority is a “state agency” and thus under the specific and explicit language of this section, any proposed industrial revenue bonds to be issued by the Kentucky Development Finance Authority must be submitted to the Office for Investment and Debt Management for review and approval prior to the issuance of such debt.

OAG 83-131

.

The review and approval function in the case, which involved issuance of industrial revenue bonds by Kentucky Development Finance Authority for benefit of corporation which desired to finance certain new equipment, should be restricted to these factors: (1) a determination that the proposed bonds were in reasonable conformity with the general legislative policy expressed in KRS Chapters 103 and 154; and (2) the evaluation of revenue projections relative to the proposed bond issue including a reasonable determination of the fiscal or financial soundness of the company; in a revenue bond issue of this category, the Division (now Office) of Investment and Debt Management has no authority to require by regulations a rating agency presentation, competitive bidding of all advisers, consultants, trustees, underwriters and bond counsel and a determination that the proposed bond issue has been legally authorized by and/or determined feasible in a biennial budget.

OAG 83-453

.

42.425.
Department for Facilities and Support Services — Organization — Duties.

The Department for Facilities and Support Services established in the Finance and Administration Cabinet by KRS

42.014

shall be generally responsible for performance of the cabinet’s functions and duties as outlined in KRS Chapters 45, 45A, and 56 with relation to the management and administration of the State Capital Construction Program, including without limitation to the generality thereof the procurement of necessary consulting services related to capital construction and building renovation projects, construction services, and supervision of building construction projects, and for the maintenance and operation of the state government’s real property management functions and physical plant management functions.

The department shall be headed by a commissioner appointed by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

The department shall have the primary responsibility for developing and implementing policies applicable to all state agencies to ensure effective planning for and efficient operation of state office buildings, and shall provide appropriate assistance regarding the planning and efficient operation of all state facilities.

The department shall be divided for administrative and operational purposes into:

The Office of Facility Development and Efficiency, headed by an executive director appointed by the secretary in accordance with KRS

12.050

. The office shall analyze and monitor guaranteed energy savings performance contracts for state agencies. The office shall include:

The Division of Engineering and Contract Administration; and

The Division of Facility Efficiency;

The Office of Building and Mechanical Services, headed by an executive director appointed by the secretary in accordance with KRS

12.050

. The office shall provide building and grounds maintenance, mechanical maintenance, and electronic security services to state-owned facilities across the Commonwealth and shall consist of the Division of Building Services and the Division of Mechanical Services;

The Division of Real Properties;

The Division of Historic Properties; and

The Division of Surplus Properties.

Each division shall be headed by a division director appointed by the secretary, subject to the approval of the Governor, and responsible to the commissioner of the Department for Facilities and Support Services. The commissioner shall provide for the distribution of the department’s work among the divisions within the department.

The Division of Surplus Properties shall be responsible for the disposition of all personal property of the state declared surplus. The division shall be the single state agency of the Commonwealth of Kentucky that may receive, warehouse, and distribute surplus property under the Federal Property and Administrative Services Act of 1949, as amended, and any other federal law relating to the disposal of surplus federal property to the states and political subdivisions within the states. The division shall comply with federal laws and regulations in the administration of surplus property received through federal agencies. The division director may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A as necessary to comply with minimum standards established by federal laws and regulations governing disposal of surplus federal property and to implement the fee or service charge provisions contained in this paragraph. The division director may establish, charge, and collect from donees of federal surplus property a fair and reasonable fee or service charge to defray the cost of operating the surplus property disposal program. The fees shall be deposited in a trust and agency account in the State Treasury to the credit of the Division of Surplus Properties.

In conjunction with the responsibilities listed in subsection (1) of this section, the Department for Facilities and Support Services shall have the following duties:

Establish policies to ensure efficient utilization of state property by:

Requiring the development of guidelines which set forth space standards and criteria for determining the space needs of state agencies, and maintaining an inventory which tracks the agencies’ compliance with those standards and criteria; and

Requiring certification of compliance, or justification for exceptions, as a criterion for approval of additional space;

Establish policies to ensure effective planning for state facilities by:

Developing a long-range plan for the Frankfort area, with priority on reducing dependency on leased space and encouraging the consolidation of agencies’ central offices into single locations, and shared offices for agencies with similar functions; and

Developing long-range plans for housing state agencies in metropolitan areas, with priority on centralization of services and coordination of service delivery systems; and

Encouraging executive branch agencies to expand long-range planning efforts, consistent with the policies of the Capital Planning Advisory Board; and

Supporting long-range planning for a statewide information technology infrastructure to more efficiently deliver state government services;

Establish priorities to allow least-cost financing of state facilities by:

Initiating policies which authorize the state to use innovative methods to lease, purchase, or construct necessary facilities; and

Requiring cost analysis to determine the most effective method of meeting space needs, with consideration for ongoing operations and initial acquisition; and

Implement and maintain a comprehensive real property and facilities management database to include all state facilities and land owned or leased by the executive branch agencies, including any postsecondary institution. All state agencies and postsecondary institutions shall work cooperatively with the Department for Facilities and Support Services to implement and maintain the database.

The Department for Facilities and Support Services shall develop plans for the placement of computing and communications equipment in all facilities owned or leased by state government. As part of this planning process, the department shall:

Provide adequate site preparation in all state-owned facilities and require the same of those from whom the state leases space as part of the lease agreement;

Fund a minimum level of site preparation for computing and communications in each new state-owned facility; and

As new office sites are developed, or existing ones undergo renovation, consider the placement of shareable high-cost, high-value facilities at strategic locations throughout the state. These facilities may include video teleconference centers, optical scanning and storage services, and gateways to high-speed communication networks.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 155, § 53, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 393, § 25, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 41, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 176, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 68, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 87, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 19, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2005, ch. 85, § 17, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 12, § 26, effective June 25, 2009.

42.430.
Plaque commemorating prisoners and missing soldiers in Vietnam War — Duties of Department of Veterans’ Affairs and Department for Facilities and Support Services.

To honor those Kentuckians who proudly served their country during the Vietnam War but remain unaccounted for, the Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall update the plaque at the base of the Freedom Tree near the Floral Clock on the grounds of the New Capitol Annex to contain the names of Kentucky Vietnam War POW/MIAs from the most recent official accounting available from the United States Department of Defense. The plaque shall also contain a depiction of the POW/MIA flag of the National League of Families of American Prisoners of War and Missing in Southeast Asia.

The Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall be responsible for the design of the new plaque required by subsection (1) of this section, and the plaque shall be paid for by the Department of Veterans’ Affairs. The Department of Veterans’ Affairs may receive appropriations, gifts, grants, federal funds, and any other funds, both public and private, to defray the cost of updating the plaque.

The Department for Facilities and Support Services shall be responsible for preparing the base for the updated plaque, and for installing the plaque. The Department for Facilities and Support Services shall be reimbursed the cost of the installation by the Department of Veterans’ Affairs. The Department for Facilities and Support Services shall also be responsible for the routine maintenance of the Freedom Tree, the memorial plaque, and the grounds surrounding the tree and plaque.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2005, ch. 85, § 18, effective June 20, 2005.

42.435.
Plaque commemorating Kentucky Congressional Medal of Honor recipients — Duties of Department for Facilities and Support Services.

To honor those who have been awarded a Congressional Medal of Honor, the United States’ highest military award for valor in combat, the Department for Facilities and Support Services shall create a plaque to contain the names of each Kentucky Congressional Medal of Honor recipient.

The Department for Facilities and Support Services shall be responsible for selecting a location on the first floor of the New State Capitol for the plaque required by subsection (1) of this section. The Department for Facilities and Support Services shall also be responsible for the design, installation, and routine maintenance of the plaque. The plaque shall be updated by the Department for Facilities and Support Services within six (6) months of a Congressional Medal of Honor nomination and approval accredited to the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 6, § 1, effective June 8, 2011.